inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VAI_IND_e.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niwebinige
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg: giwebinige
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: niwebinigemin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl: giwebinigemin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl: giwebinigem
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: webinige
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: webinigewag
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: webinigewan
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: [webinigewan,webinigewa']
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X: webinigem
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg: [niwebinigesiin,niwebinigesii]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg: [giwebinigesiin,giwebinigesii]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl: niwebinigesiimin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl: giwebinigesiimin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl: giwebinigesiim
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: [webinigesiin,giwebinigesii]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: webinigesiiwag
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: webinigesiiwan
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: [webinigesiiwan,webinigesiiwa']
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X: webinigesiim
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg: niwebinigenaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg: giwebinigenaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl: niwebinigeminaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl: giwebinigeminaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl: giwebinigemwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: webinigeban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: [webinigebaniig,webinigebaneg]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: [webinigebaniin,webinigebanen]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: [webinigebaniin,webinigebanen]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X: webinigemwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg: niwebinigesiinaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg: giwebinigesiinaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl: niwebinigesiiminaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl: giwebinigesiiminaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl: giwebinigesiimwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: webinigesiiban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: [webinigesiibaniig,webinigesiibaneg]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: [webinigesiibaniin,webinigesiibanen]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: [webinigesiibaniin,webinigesiibanen]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X: webinigesiimwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg: niwebinigenaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg: giwebinigenaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl: niwebinigeminaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl: giwebinigeminaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl: giwebinigemwaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: webinigedog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: webinigedogenag
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: webinigedogenan
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: [webinigedogenan,webinigedogena']
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X: webinigemwaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg: niwebinigesiinaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg: giwebinigesiinaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl: niwebinigesiiminaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl: giwebinigesiiminaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl: giwebinigesiimwaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: webinigesiidog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: webinigesiidogenag
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: webinigesiidogenan
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: [webinigesiidogenan,webinigesiidogena']
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X: webinigesiimwaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: webinigegoban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: webinigegwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: webinigenigoban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: webinigesiigoban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: webinigesiigwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: webinigesiinigoban
